ani_adjectives_formation.lexd
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# ADJECTIVES
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

PATTERNS

Adjective_no_class [<ADJ>:]
Adjective_no_class [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<obl><m>:ш] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,-vowel_morpheme,-n.m.sg]
Adjective_no_class [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<obl><m>:шу] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,vowel_morpheme]
Adjective_no_class [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<obl><nm>:л] [>:>] Inflection[-m,-vowel_morpheme]
Adjective_no_class [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<obl><nm>:ллъи] [>:>] Inflection[-m,vowel_morpheme]
Adjective_no_class[b] [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<pl>:ул]
Adjective_no_class[b] [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<pl>:ул] [>:>] [<obl><m>:у] [>:>] Inflection[-nm]
Adjective_no_class[b] [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<pl>:ул] [>:>] [<obl><nm>:и] [>:>] Inflection[-m]
Adjective_no_class[-b] [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<pl>:{pl}ол]
Adjective_no_class[-b] [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<pl>:{pl}ол] [>:>] [<obl><m>:у] [>:>] Inflection[-nm]
Adjective_no_class[-b] [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<pl>:{pl}ол] [>:>] [<obl><nm>:и] [>:>] Inflection[-m]

Adjective_class_suffix [<ADJ>:] [>:>] agrCl
Adjective_class_suffix [<ADJ>:] [>:>] agrCl[m] [>:>] [<obl><m>:ш] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,-vowel_morpheme,-n.m.sg]
Adjective_class_suffix [<ADJ>:] [>:>] agrCl[m] [>:>] [<obl><m>:шу] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,vowel_morpheme]
Adjective_class_suffix [<ADJ>:] [>:>] agrCl[-m,-pl] [>:>] [<obl><nm>:л] [>:>] Inflection[-m,-vowel_morpheme]
Adjective_class_suffix [<ADJ>:] [>:>] agrCl[-m,-pl] [>:>] [<obl><nm>:ллъи] [>:>] Inflection[-m,vowel_morpheme]
Adjective_class_suffix [<ADJ>:] [>:>] agrCl[-jCL,-sg] [>:>] [<pl>:ул]
Adjective_class_suffix [<ADJ>:] [>:>] agrCl[jCL] [>:>] [<pl>:ил]
Adjective_class_suffix [<ADJ>:] [>:>] agrCl[m] [>:>] [<pl>:ул] [>:>] [<obl><m>:у] [>:>] Inflection[-nm]
Adjective_class_suffix [<ADJ>:] [>:>] agrCl[-jCL,-sg,-m] [>:>] [<pl>:ул] [>:>] [<obl><nm>:и] [>:>] Inflection[-m]
Adjective_class_suffix [<ADJ>:] [>:>] agrCl[jCL] [>:>] [<pl>:ил] [>:>] [<obl><nm>:и] [>:>] Inflection[-m]

agrCl [>:>] Adjective_class_prefix [<ADJ>:]
agrCl[m] [>:>] Adjective_class_prefix [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<obl><m>:ш] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,-vowel_morpheme,-n.m.sg]
agrCl[m] [>:>] Adjective_class_prefix [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<obl><m>:шу] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,vowel_morpheme]
agrCl[-m,-pl] [>:>] Adjective_class_prefix [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<obl><nm>:л] [>:>] Inflection[-m,-vowel_morpheme]
agrCl[-m,-pl] [>:>] Adjective_class_prefix [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<obl><nm>:ллъи] [>:>] Inflection[-m,vowel_morpheme]
agrCl[-sg] [>:>] Adjective_class_prefix[b] [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<pl>:ул]
agrCl[m] [>:>] Adjective_class_prefix[b] [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<pl>:ул] [>:>] [<obl><m>:у] [>:>] Inflection[-nm]
agrCl[-sg,-m] [>:>] Adjective_class_prefix[b] [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<pl>:ул] [>:>] [<obl><nm>:и] [>:>] Inflection[-m]
agrCl[-sg] [>:>] Adjective_class_prefix[-b] [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<pl>:{pl}ол]
agrCl[m] [>:>] Adjective_class_prefix[-b] [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<pl>:{pl}ол] [>:>] [<obl><m>:у] [>:>] Inflection[-nm]
agrCl[-sg,-m] [>:>] Adjective_class_prefix[-b] [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<pl>:{pl}ол] [>:>] [<obl><nm>:и] [>:>] Inflection[-m]

agrCl[m] [>:>] [:у] Adjective_class_prefix_i_u [<ADJ>:]
agrCl[m] [>:>] [:у] Adjective_class_prefix_i_u [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<obl><m>:ш] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,-vowel_morpheme,-n.m.sg]
agrCl[m] [>:>] [:у] Adjective_class_prefix_i_u [<ADJ>:] [<obl><m>:шу] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,vowel_morpheme]
agrCl[-m,-pl] [>:>] [:и] Adjective_class_prefix_i_u [<ADJ>:]
agrCl[-m,-pl] [>:>] [:и] Adjective_class_prefix_i_u [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<obl><nm>:л] [>:>] Inflection[-m,-vowel_morpheme]
agrCl[-m,-pl] [>:>] [:и] Adjective_class_prefix_i_u [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<obl><nm>:ллъи] [>:>] Inflection[-m,vowel_morpheme]
agrCl[-sg] [>:>] [:о] Adjective_class_prefix_i_u[b] [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<pl>:ул]
agrCl[-sg] [>:>] [:о] Adjective_class_prefix_i_u[b] [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<pl>:ул] [>:>] [<obl><m>:у] [>:>] Inflection[-nm]
agrCl[-sg,-m] [>:>] [:о] Adjective_class_prefix_i_u[b] [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<pl>:ул] [>:>] [<obl><nm>:и] [>:>] Inflection[-m]
agrCl[-sg] [>:>] [:о] Adjective_class_prefix_i_u[-b] [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<pl>:{pl}ол]
agrCl[-sg] [>:>] [:о] Adjective_class_prefix_i_u[-b] [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<pl>:{pl}ол] [>:>] [<obl><m>:у] [>:>] Inflection[-nm]
agrCl[-sg,-m] [>:>] [:о] Adjective_class_prefix_i_u[-b] [<ADJ>:] [>:>] [<pl>:{pl}ол] [>:>] [<obl><nm>:и] [>:>] Inflection[-m]

Adjective_class_internal(1) :agrCl Adjective_class_internal(2) [<ADJ>:] agrCl:
Adjective_class_internal(1) :agrCl[m] Adjective_class_internal(2) [<ADJ>:] agrCl:[m] [>:>] [<obl><m>:ш] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,-vowel_morpheme,-n.m.sg]
Adjective_class_internal(1) :agrCl[m] Adjective_class_internal(2) [<ADJ>:] agrCl:[m] [>:>] [<obl><m>:шу] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,vowel_morpheme]
Adjective_class_internal(1) :agrCl[-m,-pl] Adjective_class_internal(2) [<ADJ>:] agrCl:[-m,-pl] [>:>] [<obl><nm>:л] [>:>] Inflection[-m,-vowel_morpheme]
Adjective_class_internal(1) :agrCl[-m,-pl] Adjective_class_internal(2) [<ADJ>:] agrCl:[-m,-pl] [>:>] [<obl><nm>:ллъи] [>:>] Inflection[-m,vowel_morpheme]
Adjective_class_internal(1) :agrCl[-sg] Adjective_class_internal(2) [<ADJ>:] agrCl:[-sg] [>:>] [<pl>:{pl}ол]
Adjective_class_internal(1) :agrCl[m] Adjective_class_internal(2) [<ADJ>:] agrCl:[m] [>:>] [<pl>:{pl}ол] [>:>] [<obl><m>:у] [>:>] Inflection[-nm]
Adjective_class_internal(1) :agrCl[-m,-sg] Adjective_class_internal(2) [<ADJ>:] agrCl:[-m,-sg] [>:>] [<pl>:{pl}ол] [>:>] [<obl><nm>:и] [>:>] Inflection[-m]

agrCl [>:>] Adjective_class_prefix_and_internal(1) :agrCl Adjective_class_prefix_and_internal(2) [<ADJ>:] agrCl:
agrCl[m] [>:>] Adjective_class_prefix_and_internal(1) :agrCl[m] Adjective_class_prefix_and_internal(2) [<ADJ>:] agrCl:[m] [>:>] [<obl><m>:ш] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,-vowel_morpheme,-n.m.sg]
agrCl[m] [>:>] Adjective_class_prefix_and_internal(1) :agrCl[m] Adjective_class_prefix_and_internal(2) [<ADJ>:] agrCl:[m] [>:>] [<obl><m>:шу] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,vowel_morpheme]
agrCl[-m,-pl] [>:>] Adjective_class_prefix_and_internal(1) :agrCl[-m,-pl] Adjective_class_prefix_and_internal(2) [<ADJ>:] agrCl:[-m,-pl] [>:>] [<obl><nm>:л] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,-vowel_morpheme,-n.m.sg]
agrCl[-m,-pl] [>:>] Adjective_class_prefix_and_internal(1) :agrCl[-m,-pl] Adjective_class_prefix_and_internal(2) [<ADJ>:] agrCl:[-m,-pl] [>:>] [<obl><nm>:ллъи] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,vowel_morpheme]
agrCl[-sg] [>:>] Adjective_class_prefix_and_internal(1) :agrCl[-sg] Adjective_class_prefix_and_internal(2) [<ADJ>:] agrCl:[-sg] [>:>] [<pl>:{pl}ол]
agrCl[m] [>:>] Adjective_class_prefix_and_internal(1) :agrCl[m] Adjective_class_prefix_and_internal(2) [<ADJ>:] agrCl:[m] [>:>] [<pl>:{pl}ол] [>:>] [<obl><m>:у] [>:>] Inflection[-nm]
agrCl[-m,-sg] [>:>] Adjective_class_prefix_and_internal(1) :agrCl[-m,-sg] Adjective_class_prefix_and_internal(2) [<ADJ>:] agrCl:[-m,-sg] [>:>] [<pl>:{pl}ол] [>:>] [<obl><nm>:и] [>:>] Inflection[-nm]


LEXICON agrCl

<m>:в[m]
<f>:й[jCL]
<an><sg>:б[sg]
<an><pl>:й[pl,jCL]
<inan1>:б
<inan2>:р


LEXICON Inflection

<gen>:лIи[nm]
<gen><pl>:лI>ол[nm]
<dat>:лъу[n.m.sg]
<erg>:ди
<dat>:й[vowel_morpheme]
<gen><m>:в[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><f>:й[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><an><sg>:б[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><an><pl>:й[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><inan1>:б[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><inan2>:р[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><m>><pl>:в>ул[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><f>><pl>:й>ил[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><an><pl>><pl>:й>ил[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><inan1>><pl>:б>ул[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><inan2>><pl>:р>ул[m,vowel_morpheme]
<aff><m>:во[vowel_morpheme]
<aff><f>:йо[vowel_morpheme]
<aff><an><sg>:бо[vowel_morpheme]
<aff><an><pl>:йо[vowel_morpheme]
<aff><inan1>:бо[vowel_morpheme]
<aff><inan2>:ро[vowel_morpheme]
<sub><ess>:кьи
<sub><lat>:кьи
<sub>><el>:кьи>кку
<super><ess>:ъа
<super><lat>:ъо
<super>><el>:ъа>кку
<in><ess>:ла
<in><lat>:ди
<in>><el>:ла>кку
<inter><ess>:лIи
<inter><lat>:лIи
<inter>><el>:лIи>кку
<ad><ess>:ха
<ad><lat>:хо
<ad>><el>:хо>кку
<apud><ess>:хъи
<apud><lat>:хъи
<apud>><el>:хъи>кку
<cont><ess>:чIу
<cont><lat>:чIу
<cont>><el>:чIу>кку
